Utah statutes.
78B-7-103.   Abuse or danger of abuse -- Protective orders.
(1)  Any cohabitant who has been subjected to abuse or domestic violence, or
to whom there is a substantial likelihood of abuse or domestic violence, may
seek an ex parte protective order or a protective order in accordance with
this chapter, whether or not that person has left the residence or the
premises in an effort to avoid further abuse.
(2)  A petition for a protective order may be filed under this chapter
regardless of whether an action for divorce between the parties is pending.
(3)  A petition seeking a protective order may not be withdrawn without
approval of the court.
